Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-602
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act is to allow any county, city, or village to conduct a lottery for community betterment purposes. Any lottery conducted by a county, city, or village shall be conducted only by those methods and under those circumstances prescribed in the act. No other form or method shall be authorized or allowed.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 173.